California, session 20252026, SB110.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2026 is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 122, AB 125, AB 176, SB 122, SB 125, and SB 176. SEC. 2. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.